Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.070

Form of solemnization.

In the solemnization of marriage no particular form is required, except that the parties thereto shall assent or declare in the presence of the minister, priest, imam, rabbi, or similar official of any religious organization, or judicial officer solemnizing the same, and in the presence of at least two attending witnesses, that they take each other to be spouses.

[ 2012 c 3 s 6 (Referendum Measure No. 74, approved November 6, 2012); Code 1881 s 2383; 1866 p 82 s 5; RRS s 8443.]

NOTES:

Notice—2012 c 3: See note following RCW 26.04.010.